Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 23. Disclosure of Campaign Finances.

§ 23-15-801.
Definitions.

“Election” means a general, special, primary or runoff election.

“Candidate” means an individual who seeks nomination for election, or election, to any elective office other than a federal elective office. For purposes of this article, an individual shall be deemed to seek nomination for election, or election:

If the individual has received contributions aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or has made expenditures aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or for a candidate for the Legislature or any statewide or state district office, by the qualifying deadlines specified in Sections 23-15-299 and 23-15-977, whichever occurs first; or

If the individual has given his or her consent to another person to receive contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the individual and if the other person has received contributions aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) during a calendar year, or has made expenditures aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) during a calendar year.

“Political committee” means any committee, party, club, association, political action committee, campaign committee or other groups of persons or affiliated organizations that receives contributions aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) during a calendar year or that makes expenditures aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) during a calendar year for the purpose of influencing or attempting to influence the action of voters for or against the nomination for election, or election, of one or more candidates, or balloted measures. Political committee shall, in addition, include each political party registered with the Secretary of State.

“Affiliated organization” means any organization that is not a political committee, but that directly or indirectly establishes, administers or financially supports a political committee.

(i) “Contribution” shall include any gift, subscription, loan, advance or deposit of money or anything of value made by any person or political committee for the purpose of influencing any election for elective office or balloted measure;

“Contribution” shall not include the value of services provided without compensation by any individual who volunteers on behalf of a candidate or political committee; or the cost of any food or beverage for use in any candidate’s campaign or for use by or on behalf of any political committee of a political party;

“Contribution to a political party” includes any gift, subscription, loan, advance or deposit of money or anything of value made by any person, political committee, or other organization to a political party and to any committee, subcommittee, campaign committee, political committee and other groups of persons and affiliated organizations of the political party;

“Contribution to a political party” shall not include the value of services provided without compensation by any individual who volunteers on behalf of a political party or a candidate of a political party.

(i) “Expenditure” shall include any purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, gift of money or anything of value, made by any person or political committee for the purpose of influencing any balloted measure or election for elective office; and a written contract, promise, or agreement to make an expenditure;

“Expenditure” shall not include any news story, commentary or editorial distributed through the facilities of any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, or other periodical publication, unless the facilities are owned or controlled by any political party, political committee, or candidate; or nonpartisan activity designed to encourage individuals to vote or to register to vote;

“Expenditure by a political party” includes 1. any purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, gift of money or anything of value, made by any political party and by any contractor, subcontractor, agent, and consultant to the political party; and 2. a written contract, promise, or agreement to make such an expenditure.

The term “identification” shall mean:

In the case of any individual, the name, the mailing address, and the occupation of such individual, as well as the name of his or her employer; and

In the case of any other person, the full name and address of the person.

The term “political party” shall mean an association, committee or organization which nominates a candidate for election to any elective office whose name appears on the election ballot as the candidate of the association, committee or organization.

The term “person” shall mean any individual, family, firm, corporation, partnership, association or other legal entity.

The term “independent expenditure” shall mean an expenditure by a person expressly advocating the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate that is made without cooperation or consultation with any candidate or any authorized committee or agent of the candidate, and that is not made in concert with or at the request or suggestion of any candidate or any authorized committee or agent of the candidate.

The term “clearly identified” shall mean that:

The name of the candidate involved appears; or

A photograph or drawing of the candidate appears; or

The identity of the candidate is apparent by unambiguous reference.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], §23-3-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], and §23-3-67 [Codes, 1942, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], which were repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 334, 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 247(1); Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 7; Laws, 2017, ch. 417, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-803.
Registration of political committees; administrative penalties for failure to comply.

Each political committee shall file a statement of organization which must be received by the Secretary of State no later than forty-eight (48) hours after:

Receipt of contributions aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), or

Having made expenditures aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00).

The content of the statement of organization of a political committee shall include:

The name, address, officers, and members of the committee;

The designation of a chair of the organization and a custodian of the financial books, records and accounts of the organization, who shall be designated treasurer; and

If the committee is authorized by a candidate, then the name, address, office sought and party affiliation of the candidate.

Any change in information previously submitted in a statement of organization shall be reported and noted on the next regularly scheduled report.

In addition to any other penalties provided by law, the Mississippi Ethics Commission may impose administrative penalties against any political committee that fails to comply with the requirements of this section in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation. The notice, hearing and appeals provisions of Section 23-15-813 shall apply to any action taken pursuant to this subsection (4). The Mississippi Ethics Commission may pursue judicial enforcement of any penalties issued pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], §23-3-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], and §23-3-67 [Codes, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1] which were repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 334, 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 247(2); Laws, 2017, ch. 417, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-805.
Filing of reports; public inspection and preservation of reports.

Candidates for state, state district, and legislative district offices, and every political committee, which makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a candidate for any such office or makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a statewide ballot measure, shall file all reports required under this article with the Office of the Secretary of State.

Candidates for county or county district office, and every political committee which makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a candidate for such office or makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a countywide ballot measure or a ballot measure affecting part of a county, excepting a municipal ballot measure, shall file all reports required by this section in the office of the circuit clerk of the county in which the election occurs, or directly to the Office of the Secretary of State via facsimile, electronic mail, postal mail or hand delivery. The circuit clerk shall forward copies of all reports to the Office of the Secretary of State.

Candidates for municipal office, and every political committee which makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a candidate for such office, or makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a municipal ballot measure shall file all reports required by this article in the office of the municipal clerk of the municipality in which the election occurs, or directly to the Office of the Secretary of State via facsimile, electronic mail, postal mail or hand delivery. The municipal clerk shall forward copies of all reports to the Office of the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State, the circuit clerks and the municipal clerks shall make all reports received under this subsection available for public inspection and copying and shall preserve the reports for a period of five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], §23-3-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], and §23-3-67 [Codes, 1942, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], which were repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 334, 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 247(3); Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 8; Laws, 2001, ch. 301, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 417, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-807.
Reporting requirements; contributions and disbursements of candidates and political committees.

Each candidate or political committee shall file reports of contributions and disbursements in accordance with the provisions of this section. All candidates or political committees required to report such contributions and disbursements may terminate the obligation to report only upon submitting a final report that contributions will no longer be received or disbursements made and that the candidate or committee has no outstanding debts or obligations. The candidate, treasurer or chief executive officer shall sign the report.

Candidates seeking election, or nomination for election, and political committees making expenditures to influence or attempt to influence voters for or against the nomination for election of one or more candidates or balloted measures at such election, shall file the following reports:

In any calendar year during which there is a regularly scheduled election, a pre-election report shall be filed no later than the seventh day before any election in which the candidate or political committee has accepted contributions or made expenditures and shall be completed as of the tenth day before the election;

In 1987 and every fourth year thereafter, periodic reports shall be filed no later than the tenth day after April 30, May 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31, and shall be completed as of the last day of each period;

In any calendar years except 1987 and except every fourth year thereafter, a report covering the calendar year shall be filed no later than January 31 of the following calendar year; and

Except as otherwise provided in the requirements of paragraph (i) of this subsection (b), unopposed candidates are not required to file pre-election reports but must file all other reports required by paragraphs (ii) and (iii) of this subsection (b).

All candidates for judicial office as defined in Section 23-15-975, or their political committees, shall file periodic reports in the year in which they are to be elected no later than the tenth day after April 30, May 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31.

Each report under this article shall disclose:

For the reporting period and the calendar year, the total amount of all contributions and the total amount of all expenditures of the candidate or reporting committee, including those required to be identified pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection (d) as well as the total of all other contributions and expenditures during the calendar year. The reports shall be cumulative during the calendar year to which they relate;

The identification of:

1. Each person or political committee who makes a contribution to the reporting candidate or political committee during the reporting period, whose contribution or contributions within the calendar year have an aggregate amount or value in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) together with the date and amount of any such contribution;

2. Each person or organization, candidate or political committee who receives an expenditure, payment or other transfer from the reporting candidate, political committee or its agent, employee, designee, contractor, consultant or other person or persons acting in its behalf during the reporting period when the expenditure, payment or other transfer to the person, organization, candidate or political committee within the calendar year have an aggregate value or amount in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) together with the date and amount of the expenditure;

The total amount of cash on hand of each reporting candidate and reporting political committee;

In addition to the contents of reports specified in paragraphs (i), (ii) and (iii) of this subsection (d), each political party shall disclose:

1. Each person or political committee who makes a contribution to a political party during the reporting period and whose contribution or contributions to a political party within the calendar year have an aggregate amount or value in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), together with the date and amount of the contribution;

2. Each person or organization who receives an expenditure or expenditures by a political party during the reporting period when the expenditure or expenditures to the person or organization within the calendar year have an aggregate value or amount in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), together with the date and amount of the expenditure;

Disclosure required under this section of an expenditure to a credit card issuer, financial institution or business allowing payments and money transfers to be made over the Internet must include, by way of detail or separate entry, the amount of funds passing to each person, business entity or organization receiving funds from the expenditure.

The appropriate office specified in Section 23-15-805 must be in actual receipt of the reports specified in this article by 5:00 p.m. on the dates specified in subsection (b) of this section. If the date specified in subsection (b) of this section shall fall on a weekend or legal holiday then the report shall be due in the appropriate office at 5:00 p.m. on the first working day before the date specified in subsection (b) of this section. The reporting candidate or reporting political committee shall ensure that the reports are delivered to the appropriate office by the filing deadline. The Secretary of State may approve specific means of electronic transmission of completed campaign finance disclosure reports, which may include, but not be limited to, transmission by electronic facsimile (FAX) devices.

(i) If any contribution of more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) is received by a candidate or candidate’s political committee after the tenth day, but more than forty-eight (48) hours before 12:01 a.m. of the day of the election, the candidate or political committee shall notify the appropriate office designated in Section 23-15-805, within forty-eight (48) hours of receipt of the contribution. The notification shall include:

1. The name of the receiving candidate;

2. The name of the receiving candidate’s political committee, if any;

3. The office sought by the candidate;

4. The identification of the contributor;

5. The date of receipt;

6. The amount of the contribution;

7. If the contribution is in-kind, a description of the in-kind contribution; and

8. The signature of the candidate or the treasurer or chair of the candidate’s political organization.

The notification shall be in writing, and may be transmitted by overnight mail, courier service, or other reliable means, including electronic facsimile (FAX), but the candidate or candidate’s committee shall ensure that the notification shall in fact be received in the appropriate office designated in Section 23-15-805 within forty-eight (48) hours of the contribution.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], §23-3-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], and §23-3-67 [Codes, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], which were repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 334, 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 247(u); Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 9; Laws, 2017, ch. 417, § 5, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-809.
Statements by persons other than political committees; filing; indices of expenditures.

Every person who makes independent expenditures in an aggregate amount or value in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) during a calendar year shall file a statement containing the information required under Section 23-15-807. Such statement shall be filed with the appropriate offices as provided for in Section 23-15-805, and such person shall be considered a political committee for the purpose of determining place of filing.

Statements required to be filed by this section shall include:

Information indicating whether the independent expenditure is in support of, or in opposition to, the candidate involved;

Under penalty of perjury, a certification of whether or not such independent expenditure is made in cooperation, consultation or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, any candidate or any authorized committee or agent of such candidate; and

The identification of each person who made a contribution in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) to the person filing such statement which was made for the purpose of furthering an independent expenditure.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], §23-3-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], and §23-3-67 [Codes, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], which were repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 334, 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 247(5), eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-811.
Penalties.

Any candidate or any other person who willfully violates the provisions and prohibitions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine in a sum not to exceed Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) or imprisoned for not longer than six (6) months or by both fine and imprisonment.

In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (a) of this section and Chapter 13, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, any candidate or political committee which is required to file a statement or report and fails to file the statement or report on the date it is due may be compelled to file the statement or report by an action in the nature of a mandamus brought by the Mississippi Ethics Commission.

No candidate shall be certified as nominated for election or as elected to office until he or she files all reports required by this article that are due as of the date of certification.

No candidate who is elected to office shall receive any salary or other remuneration for the office until he or she files all reports required by this article that are due as of the date the salary or remuneration is payable.

In the event that a candidate fails to timely file any report required pursuant to this article but subsequently files a report or reports containing all of the information required to be reported, the candidate shall not be subject to the sanctions of subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], §23-3-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], and §23-3-67 [Codes, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], which were repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 334, 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 247(6); Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 10; Laws, 2017, ch. 417, § 6, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-813.
Civil penalty for failure to file campaign finance disclosure report; notice to candidate of failure to file; assessment of penalty by Mississippi Ethics Commission; hearing; appeal.

In addition to any other penalty permitted by law, the Mississippi Ethics Commission shall require any candidate or political committee, as identified in Section 23-15-805(a), and any other political committee registered with the Secretary of State, who fails to file a campaign finance disclosure report as required under Sections 23-15-801 through 23-15-813, or Sections 23-17-47 through 23-17-53, or who shall file a report that fails to substantially comply with the requirements of Sections 23-15-801 through 23-15-813, or Sections 23-17-47 through 23-17-53, to be assessed a civil penalty as follows:

Within five (5) calendar days after any deadline for filing a report pursuant to Sections 23-15-801 through 23-15-813, or Sections 23-17-47 through 23-17-53, the Secretary of State shall compile a list of those candidates and political committees who have failed to file a report. The list shall be provided to the Mississippi Ethics Commission. The Secretary of State shall provide each candidate or political committee, who has failed to file a report, notice of the failure by first-class mail.

Beginning with the tenth calendar day after which any report is due, the Mississippi Ethics Commission shall assess the delinquent candidate and political committee a civil penalty of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for each day or part of any day until a valid report is delivered to the Secretary of State, up to a maximum of ten (10) days. In the discretion of the Mississippi Ethics Commission, the assessing of the fine may be waived, in whole or in part, if the Commission determines that unforeseeable mitigating circumstances, such as the health of the candidate, interfered with the timely filing of a report. Failure of a candidate or political committee to receive notice of failure to file a report from the Secretary of State is not an unforeseeable mitigating circumstance, and failure to receive the notice shall not result in removal or reduction of any assessed civil penalty.

Filing of the required report and payment of the fine within ten (10) calendar days of notice by the Secretary of State that a required statement has not been filed constitutes compliance with Sections 23-15-801 through 23-15-813, or Sections 23-17-47 through 23-17-53.

Payment of the fine without filing the required report does not excuse or exempt any person from the filing requirements of Sections 23-15-801 through 23-15-813, and Sections 23-17-47 through 23-17-53.

If any candidate or political committee is assessed a civil penalty, and the penalty is not subsequently waived by the Mississippi Ethics Commission, the candidate or political committee shall pay the fine to the Commission within ninety (90) days of the date of the assessment of the fine. If, after one hundred twenty (120) days of the assessment of the fine the payment for the entire amount of the assessed fine has not been received by the Commission, the Commission shall notify the Attorney General of the delinquency, and the Attorney General shall file, where necessary, a suit to compel payment of the civil penalty.

(i) Upon the sworn application, made within sixty (60) calendar days of the date upon which the required report is due, of a candidate or political committee against whom a civil penalty has been assessed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of State shall forward the application to the State Board of Election Commissioners. The State Board of Election Commissioners shall appoint one or more hearing officers who shall be former chancellors, circuit court judges, judges of the Court of Appeals or justices of the Supreme Court, to conduct hearings held pursuant to this article. The hearing officer shall fix a time and place for a hearing and shall cause a written notice specifying the civil penalties that have been assessed against the candidate or political committee and notice of the time and place of the hearing to be served upon the candidate or political committee at least twenty (20) calendar days before the hearing date. The notice may be served by mailing a copy of the notice by certified mail, postage prepaid, to the last-known business address of the candidate or political committee.

The hearing officer may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents at the hearing. Process issued by the hearing officer shall extend to all parts of the state and shall be served by any person designated by the hearing officer for the service.

The candidate or political committee has the right to appear either personally, by counsel or both, to produce witnesses or evidence in his or her behalf, to cross-examine witnesses and to have subpoenas issued by the hearing officer.

At the hearing, the hearing officer shall administer oaths as may be necessary for the proper conduct of the hearing. All hearings shall be conducted by the hearing officer, who shall not be bound by strict rules of procedure or by the laws of evidence, but the determination shall be based upon sufficient evidence to sustain it. The scope of review at the hearing shall be limited to making a determination of whether failure to file a required report was due to an unforeseeable mitigating circumstance.

In any proceeding before the hearing officer, if any witness fails or refuses to attend upon a subpoena issued by the commission, refuses to testify, or refuses to produce any documents called for by a subpoena, the attendance of the witness, the giving of his or her testimony or the production of the documents shall be enforced by a court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state.

Within fifteen (15) calendar days after conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall reduce his or her decision to writing and forward an attested true copy of the decision to the last-known business address of the candidate or political committee by way of United States first-class, certified mail, postage prepaid.

(i) The right to appeal from the decision of the hearing officer in an administrative hearing concerning the assessment of civil penalties authorized pursuant to this section is granted. The appeal shall be to the Circuit Court of Hinds County and shall include a verbatim transcript of the testimony at the hearing. The appeal shall be taken within thirty (30) calendar days after notice of the decision of the commission following an administrative hearing. The appeal shall be perfected upon filing notice of the appeal and the prepayment of all costs, including the cost of preparing the record of the proceedings by the hearing officer, and filing a bond in the sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), conditioned that if the decision of the hearing officer is affirmed by the court, the candidate or political committee will pay the costs of the appeal and the action in court. If the decision is reversed by the court, the Mississippi Ethics Commission will pay the costs of the appeal and the action in court.

If there is an appeal, the appeal shall act as a supersedeas. The court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly. The hearing on the appeal may be tried in vacation, in the court’s discretion. The scope of review of the court shall be limited to a review of the record made before the hearing officer to determine if the action of the hearing officer is unlawful for the reason that it was 1. not supported by substantial evidence, 2. arbitrary or capricious, 3. beyond the power of the hearing officer to make, or 4. in violation of some statutory or constitutional right of the appellant. The decision of the court may be appealed to the Supreme Court in the manner provided by law.

If, after forty-five (45) calendar days of the date of the administrative hearing procedure set forth in subsection (b), the candidate or political committee identified in subsection (a) of this section fails to pay the monetary civil penalty imposed by the hearing officer, the Secretary of State shall notify the Attorney General of the delinquency. The Attorney General shall investigate the offense in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and where necessary, file suit to compel payment of the unpaid civil penalty.

If, after twenty (20) calendar days of the date upon which a campaign finance disclosure report is due, a candidate or political committee identified in subsection (a) of this section shall not have filed a valid report with the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall notify the Attorney General of those candidates and political committees who have not filed a valid report, and the Attorney General shall prosecute the delinquent candidates and political committees.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], §23-3-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], and §23-3-67 [Codes, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 334, 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 247(7); Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 26; Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 11; Laws, 2017, ch. 417, § 7, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-815.
Administrative provisions; duties of Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall prescribe and make available forms and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this article.

The Secretary of State, circuit clerks and municipal clerks shall, within forty-eight (48) hours after the time of the receipt by the appropriate office of reports and statements filed with it, make them available for public inspection, and copying at the expense of the person requesting such copying, and keep such designations, reports and statements for a period of three (3) years from the date of receipt.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], §23-3-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], and §23-3-67 [Codes, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1], which were repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 334, 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 247(8), eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-817.
Compilation and dissemination of list of candidates failing to meet filing requirements.

The Secretary of State shall compile a list of all candidates for the Legislature or any statewide office who fail to file a campaign disclosure report by the dates specified in Section 23-15-807(b). The list shall be provided to the Mississippi Ethics Commission so that the commission may bring a mandamus as provided in Section 23-15-811 or take any other disciplinary action as provided in this chapter. The list shall also be disseminated to the members of the Mississippi Press Association within two (2) working days after such reports are due and made available to the public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 12; Laws, 2017, ch. 417, § 8, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 23-15-819.
Campaign contributions or expenditures of money or other things of value by foreign nationals prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for a foreign national, directly or through any other person, to make any contribution or any expenditure of money or other thing of value, or to promise expressly or impliedly to make any such contribution or expenditure, in connection with an election to any political office or in connection with any primary election, convention or caucus held to select candidates for any political office.

No person shall solicit, accept or receive any such contribution from a foreign national.

The term “foreign national” means:

A foreign national as defined in 22 USCS 611(b), except that the terms “foreign national” does not include any individual who is a citizen of the United States; or

An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 131, eff from and after July 1, 2017.